Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 99D.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. To adopt standards regarding the duration of thoroughbred and quarter horse racing seasons, so that a thoroughbred racing season shall not be less than sixty-seven days, and so that a quarter horse racing season shall not be less than twenty-six days. The thoroughbred and quarter horse racing seasons shall be run independently unless mutually agreed upon by the associations representing the thoroughbred and quarter horse owners and the licensee of the horse racetrack located in Polk county. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 99D.7A Thoroughbred and quarter horse racing seasons. 1. Thoroughbred and quarter horse racing seasons shall be conducted as separate stand-alone meets that do not overlap, other than as provided in this section. A race for one breed shall not be scheduled or conducted on the same calendar day as a race for the other breed, and the racing season for one breed shall not commence until the racing season for the other breed has concluded, unless mutually agreed upon in writing by the associations representing the thoroughbred and quarter horse owners and the licensee of the horse racetrack located in Polk county. House File 2615, p. 2 2. An arrangement in which races for both thoroughbreds and quarter horses are scheduled during overlapping or concurrent periods shall be deemed a mixed meet and shall only occur pursuant to a mutual written agreement under subsection 1. Sec. 3. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The general assembly finds that a recent decision or interpretation of the state racing and gaming commission suggesting that thoroughbred and quarter horse races may be held on the same calendar day without the agreement of the associations representing the thoroughbred and quarter horse owners and the licensee of the horse racetrack located in Polk county, does not comply with the requirement in section 99D.7, subsection 3, that such races run independently. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2615, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor